Tennessee, session 114, HB0944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1301, is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions:
( ) "Assault weapon" means:
(A)
(i) A selective-fire firearm capable of fully automatic,
semiautomatic, or burst fire at the option of the user or any of the
following specified semiautomatic firearms:
(a) Algimec Agmi;
(b) Armalite AR-180;
(c) Australian Automatic Arms SAP Pistol;
(d) Auto-Ordnance Thompson type;
(e) Avtomat Kalashnikov AK-47 type;
(f) Barrett Light-Fifty model 82A1;
(g) Beretta AR-70;
(h) Bushmaster Auto Rifle and Auto Pistol;
(i) Calico models M-900, M-950, and 100-P;
(j) Chartered Industries of Singapore SR-88;
(k) Colt AR-15 and Sporter;
(l) Daewoo K-1, K-2, Max-1, and Max-2;
HB0944
001983
- 1 -

(m) Encom MK-IV, MP-9, and MP-45;
(n) Fabrique Nationale FN/FAL, FN/LAR, or FN/FNC;
(o) FAMAS MAS 223;
(p) Feather AT-9 and Mini-AT;
(q) Federal XC-900 and XC-450;
(r) Franchi SPAS-12 and LAW-12;
(s) Galil AR and ARM;
(t) Goncz High-Tech Carbine and High-Tech Long Pistol;
(u) Heckler & Koch HK-91, HK-93, HK-94, and SP-89;
(v) Holmes MP-83;
(w) MAC-10, MAC-11, and MAC-11 Carbine type;
(x) Intratec TEC-9 and Scorpion;
(y) Iver Johnson Enforcer model 3000;
(z) Ruger Mini-14/5F folding stock model only;
(aa) Scarab Skorpion;
(bb) SIG 57 AMT and 500 series;
(cc) Spectre Auto Carbine and Auto Pistol;
(dd) Springfield Armory BM59, SAR-48, and G-3;
(ee) Sterling MK-6 and MK-7;
(ff) Steyr AUG;
(gg) Street Sweeper and Striker 12 revolving cylinder
shotguns;
(hh) USAS-12;
(ii) UZI Carbine, Mini-Carbine and Pistol;
(jj) Weaver Arms Nighthawk; or
- 2 - 001983

(kk) Wilkinson Arms Linda Pistol; or
(ii) A part or combination of parts designed or intended to convert
a firearm into an assault weapon, as defined in subdivision ( )(A)(i), or any
combination of parts from which an assault weapon may be rapidly
assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the
same person;
(B) Any of the following specified semiautomatic centerfire rifles, or
copies or duplicates with the capability of any such rifles:
(i) AK-47;
(ii) AK-74;
(iii) AKM;
(iv) AKS-74U;
(v) ARM;
(vi) MAADI AK-47;
(vii) MAK90;
(viii) MISR;
(ix) NHM90 and NHM91;
(x) Norinco 56, 56S, 84S, and 86S;
(xi) Poly Technologies AKS and AK-47;
(xii) SA 85;
(xiii) SA 93;
(xiv) VEPR;
(xv) WASR-10;
(xvi) WUM;
(xvii) Rock River Arms LAR-47;
- 3 - 001983

(xviii) Vector Arms AK-47;
(xix) AR-10;
(xx) AR-15;
(xxi) Bushmaster Carbon 15, Bushmaster XM15, Bushmaster
ACR Rifles, and Bushmaster MOE Rifles;
(xxii) Colt Match Target Rifles;
(xxiii) Armalite M15;
(xxiv) Olympic Arms AR-15, A1, CAR, PCR, K3B, K30R, K16,
K48, K8, and K9 Rifles;
(xxv) DPMS Tactical Rifles;
(xxvi) Smith and Wesson M&P15 Rifles;
(xxvii) Rock River Arms LAR-15;
(xxviii) Doublestar AR Rifles;
(xxix) Barrett REC7;
(xxx) Beretta Storm;
(xxxi) Calico Liberty 50, 50 Tactical, 100, 100 Tactical, I, I
Tactical, II, and II Tactical Rifles;
(xxxii) Hi-Point Carbine Rifles;
(xxxiii) HK-PSG-1;
(xxxiv) Kel-Tec Sub-2000, SU Rifles, and RFB;
(xxxv) Remington Tactical Rifle Model 7615;
(xxxvi) SAR-8, SAR-4800, and SR9;
(xxxvii) SLG 95;
(xxxviii) SLR 95 or 96;
(xxxix) TNW M230 and M2HB;
- 4 - 001983

(xl) Vector Arms UZI;
(xli) Galil and Galil Sporter;
(xlii) Daewoo AR 100 and AR 110C;
(xliii) Fabrique Nationale/FN 308 Match and L1A1 Sporter;
(xliv) HK USC;
(xlv) IZHMASH Saiga AK;
(xlvi) SIG Sauer 551-A1, 556, 516, 716, and M400 Rifles;
(xlvii) Valmet M62S, M71S, and M78S;
(xlviii) Wilkinson Arms Linda Carbine; or
(xlix) Barrett M107A1;
(C) Any of the following specified semiautomatic pistols, or copies or
duplicates with the capability of any such pistols:
(i) Centurion 39 AK;
(ii) Draco AK-47;
(iii) HCR AK-47;
(iv) IO Inc. Hellpup AK-47;
(v) Mini-Draco AK-47;
(vi) Yugo Krebs Krink;
(vii) American Spirit AR-15;
(viii) Bushmaster Carbon 15;
(ix) Doublestar Corporation AR;
(x) DPMS AR-15;
(xi) Olympic Arms AR-15;
(xii) Rock River Arms LAR 15;
(xiii) Calico Liberty III and III Tactical Pistols;
- 5 - 001983

(xiv) Masterpiece Arms MPA Pistols and Velocity Arms VMA
Pistols;
(xv) Intratec TEC-DC9 and AB-10;
(xvi) Colefire Magnum;
(xvii) German Sport 522 PK and Chiappa Firearms Mfour-22;
(xviii) DSA SA58 PKP FAL;
(xix) I.O. Inc. PPS-43C;
(xx) Kel-Tec PLR-16 Pistol;
(xxi) Sig Sauer P516 and P556 Pistols;or
(xxii) Thompson TA5 Pistols;
(D) IZHMASH Saiga 12 Shotguns that are semiautomatic shotguns, or
copies or duplicates with the capability of that shotgun;
(E) Any semiautomatic firearm regardless of whether such firearm is
listed in subdivisions ( )(A)-(D), if the firearm is:
(i) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has an ability to accept a
detachable magazine and has at least one (1) of the following:
(a) A folding or telescoping stock;
(b) A weapon grip, including a pistol grip, a thumbhole
stock, or other stock, that would allow an individual to grip the
weapon in a manner that allows another finger on the trigger hand
in addition to the trigger finger to be directly below any portion of
the action of the weapon when firing;
(c) A forward pistol grip;
(d) A flash suppressor; or
(e) A grenade launcher or flare launcher;
- 6 - 001983

(ii) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has a fixed magazine with
the ability to accept more than ten (10) rounds;
(iii) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has an overall length of
less than thirty inches (30");
(iv) A semiautomatic pistol that has an ability to accept a
detachable magazine and has at least one (1) of the following:
(a) An ability to accept a detachable ammunition
magazine that attaches at some location outside of the pistol grip;
(b) A threaded barrel capable of accepting a flash
suppressor, forward pistol grip, silencer, or suppressor;
(c) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely
encircles, the barrel and that permits the shooter to fire the firearm
without being burned, except a slide that encloses the barrel; or
(d) A second hand grip;
(v) A semiautomatic pistol with a fixed magazine that has the
ability to accept more than ten (10) rounds;
(vi) A semiautomatic shotgun that has both of the following:
(a) A folding or telescoping stock; and
(b) A weapon grip, including a pistol grip, a thumbhole
stock, or other stock, the use of which would allow an individual to
grip the weapon in a manner that allows another finger on the
trigger hand in addition to the trigger finger to be directly below
any portion of the action of the weapon when firing;
(vii) A semiautomatic shotgun that has the ability to accept a
detachable magazine; or
- 7 - 001983

(viii) A shotgun with a revolving cylinder; or
(F) A part or combination of parts designed or intended to convert a
firearm into an assault weapon or any combination of parts from which an assault
weapon may be assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the
control of the same person;
( ) "Semiautomatic rifle" means any repeating rifle that utilizes a portion of the
energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next
round, and that requires a separate function of the trigger to fire each projectile;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (a)(4):
(4) An assault weapon;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (a)(8):
(8) A semiautomatic rifle that is equipped, altered, or modified to include any
part, combination of parts, component, device, attachment, or accessory, the possession
or use of which is prohibited by § 39-17-1330(a);
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302(c), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
( ) If the weapon is an assault weapon as described in subdivision (a)(4), the
person possessed the weapon prior to July 1, 2025;
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(1) A person in possession of an assault weapon prior to July 1, 2025, must
apply for a certificate of possession by July 1, 2026.
- 8 - 001983

(2) The department of safety shall create the application, the certificate of
possession, and the process of applying for and submitting the certificate by January 1,
2026. The certificate of possession must contain a description of the firearm that
identifies it uniquely, including all identification marks, the full name, address, date of
birth, and thumbprint of the owner, and any other information as the department may
deem appropriate.
(3) A certificate of possession for each assault weapon possessed by the person
must be submitted to both the department and the appropriate local law enforcement
agency by January 1, 2027. A copy of the certificate of possession must be retained by
the person as evidence of lawful possession.
(4) A person who obtains ownership by bequest or intestate succession of an
assault weapon for which a certificate of possession has been issued under this section
shall, within ninety (90) days:
(A) Render the assault weapon permanently inoperable;
(B) Sell the assault weapon to a licensed gun dealer; or
(C) Remove the assault weapon from this state.
(5) A person who is a member of the United States armed forces who is in lawful
possession of an assault weapon and has been transferred into this state after January
1, 2027, shall, within ninety (90) days of arriving in this state:
(A) Apply to the department of safety for a certificate of possession and
then submit the certificate of possession within ninety (90) days;
(B) Render the assault weapon permanently inoperable;
(C) Sell the assault weapon to a licensed gun dealer; or
(D) Remove the assault weapon from this state.
- 9 - 001983

(6) If an owner of an assault weapon sells or transfers the assault weapon to a
licensed gun dealer, then the dealer shall, at the time of delivery of the assault weapon,
execute a certificate of transfer and cause the certificate of transfer to be mailed or
delivered to the department.
(7) The department shall create a certificate of transfer and the process of
submitting the certificate to the department by January 1, 2026. The certificate of
transfer must contain:
(A) The date of sale or transfer;
(B) The name and address of the seller or transferor and the licensed
gun dealer and their social security numbers or driver license numbers, if
applicable;
(C) The licensed gun dealer's federal firearms license number and
seller's permit number;
(D) A description of the assault weapon, including the caliber of the
assault weapon and its make, model, and serial number; and
(E) Any other information the commissioner deems appropriate.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302(d), is amended by
deleting the language "subdivisions (a)(3) or (a)(4)" and substituting instead the language
"subdivision (a)(3)".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section 39-17-1330:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, it is an offense to knowingly
purchase, use, possess, or attempt to purchase, use, or possess a trigger crank, bump
stock, bump-fire device, or any other part, combination of parts, component, device,
- 10 - 001983

attachment, or accessory that is designed or functions to accelerate the rate of fire of a
semiautomatic rifle but does not convert the semiautomatic rifle into a machine gun.
(b) It is an offense to knowingly manufacture, sell, offer for sale, or display for
sale in this state any part, combination of parts, component, device, attachment, or
accessory, the possession or use of which is prohibited by subsection (a).
(c) A violation of subsection (a) or (b) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 8. For purposes of promulgating forms, certificates, and rules, this act takes
effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes
effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and applies to semiautomatic rifles as
described in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302(a)(8), as amended by Section 3
of this act, manufactured, transported, repaired, or sold and devices described in Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1330, as amended by Section 7 of this act, purchased or used
on or after July 1, 2025.
- 11 - 001983